Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Petitions

2-5-101. Time for filing — Required signatures — Failure to file — Filing office hours — Prohibited acts — Death or late withdrawal of candidates.

Candidates shall qualify by filing all nominating petitions, including any duplicate nominating petitions, by the deadlines set out in the schedule in this section. The qualifying deadline for any office not included in this section shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the third Thursday in the third calendar month before the election.

Independent and primary candidates for any office to be filled at the regular November election for which a primary is required to be held at the regular August election shall qualify by filing such candidates' nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the first Thursday in April.

Independent and primary candidates for any office to be filled in a regular August general election for which a May primary has been called under § 2-13-203 shall qualify by filing their petitions for the August election no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the third Thursday in February. In the event no May primary authorized under § 2-13-203 is called for any office to be filled in the regular August general election, then the candidates shall qualify by filing their petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the first Thursday in April. In presidential election years, if a political party calls for the county primary in March, the qualifying deadline for candidates in the primary and independent candidates for those offices shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the second Thursday in December. Independent candidates for offices which will appear on the county primary ballot shall qualify by filing their petitions at the same time primary candidates qualify.

Candidates in municipal elections held in conjunction with the regular August election shall file their nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the first Thursday in April. Candidates in municipal elections held in conjunction with the presidential preference primary election shall file their nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the second Thursday in December. Candidates in all other municipal elections shall file their nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the third Thursday in the third calendar month before the election.

In counties having a population in excess of six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent census, candidates in municipal elections will file their nominating petitions in accordance with time and date as prescribed for the August primary and November general election. When a special election is being held in conjunction with either a municipal August primary or November general election, the time of qualifying for candidates to the office for which the special election is being held shall conform and be governed by the same time and the same date prescribed for the municipal August primary or November general election; but in no way shall the time for qualifying specified by this subdivision (a)(4) be less than the qualifying time prescribed for the special election.

Nominating petitions shall be signed by the candidate and twenty-five (25) or more registered voters who are eligible to vote to fill the office. Nominating petitions for independent presidential candidates shall be signed by the candidate and twenty-five (25) or more registered voters for each elector allocated to the state. Each independent candidate must designate the full number of electors allocated to the state.

The signer of a petition must include the address of the signer's residence as shown on the signer's voter registration card in order for that person's signature to be counted. In the event that the signer of a petition includes information on a nominating petition that exceeds the information contained on such person's voter registration card, the signature shall be counted if there is no conflict between the nominating petition and the voter registration card. If no street address is shown on the signer's voter registration card, that person's signature and address as shown on the voter registration card shall be sufficient. A street address shall be sufficient, and no apartment number shall be required.

A person's regular signature shall be accepted just as the person's legal signature would be accepted. For example, for the purposes of this subsection (b), “Joe Public” shall be accepted just as “Joseph Q. Public” would be accepted.

If a candidate does not file by the deadline specified in this section, or fails to file any duplicate petition required by § 2-5-104 by the deadline specified in this section, or the candidate's petition does not contain the signatures and residential addresses of twenty-five (25) or more registered voters eligible to vote to fill the office, the candidate's name shall not be printed on any official ballot for the election.

Offices in which petitions are to be filed shall be open until four o'clock (4:00 p.m.) prevailing time on the final day of any qualifying period.

The name of any candidate nominated by any political party by any method other than a primary election, for any office to be filled in a regular August election for which a March or May primary has been called under § 2-13-203 shall be certified by the party executive committee to the county election commission or county administrator of elections by the qualifying deadline for the respective primary as provided for elsewhere in this section. If no primary is held, party nominees shall be certified no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the first Thursday in April.

It is unlawful for any person to qualify as a candidate in a primary election with more than one (1) political party in which such person seeks the same office.

It is unlawful for any person to qualify as an independent candidate and as a primary candidate for the same office in the same year.

No person defeated in a primary election or party caucus shall qualify as an independent for the general election.

No candidate in a party primary election or party caucus may appear on the ballot in a general election as the nominee of a different political party or as an independent.

No candidate, whether independent or represented by a political party, may be permitted to submit and have accepted by any election commission, more than one (1) qualifying petition, or otherwise qualify and be nominated, or have such candidate's name anywhere appear on any ballot for any election or primary, wherein such candidate is attempting to be qualified for and nominated or elected to more than one (1) state office as described in either § 2-13-202(1) or (2) or in article VI of the Constitution of Tennessee or more than one (1) constitutional county office described in article VII, § 1 of the Constitution of Tennessee or any other county-wide office, voted on by voters during any primary or general election.

It is unlawful for a person to qualify as a candidate for any election if such person has failed to file any required report for which a civil penalty has been imposed under chapter 10 of this title.

If a candidate in a primary election or nonpartisan general election, after the qualifying deadline:

Dies;

Withdraws because of military call up;

Withdraws because of physical or mental disability, such physical or mental disability being properly documented by competent medical authority;

Withdraws because such candidate is forced to change residence by the candidate's employer for a job-related reason;

Is declared ineligible or disqualified by a court or disqualified by the political party executive committee under § 2-5-204;

Is declared disqualified by the peace officer standards and training (POST) commission pursuant to § 8-8-102(e); or

Is declared disqualified by the Tennessee highway officials certification board pursuant to § 54-7-104;leaving no candidates for nomination or office, additional candidates may qualify for the election or that nomination by filing their petitions as provided by law no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time on the fortieth day before the election. If any of these events occur within ten (10) days of the fortieth day, the qualifying deadline shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time on the tenth day following the death or withdrawal.

Candidates may withdraw for reasons other than those listed in subdivision (g)(1); however, no additional candidates may qualify.

This subsection (h) shall be known and may be cited as the “Anti-Skullduggery Act of 1991.”

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, additional candidates may qualify for an office by qualifying as provided by law no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the seventh day after the original withdrawal deadline, if an incumbent of such office is a candidate for a primary or a nonpartisan general election and if such incumbent dies or properly withdraws on the last day for qualifying or prior to twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the seventh day after the qualifying deadline.

If an incumbent withdraws during the period specified in subdivision (h)(2), this subsection (h) shall operate to:

Extend the period to qualify for the primary election of each political party holding a primary for that office;

Extend the period during which a political party that would have been authorized by law to nominate a candidate for the office by a means other than primary election, but did not do so prior to the withdrawal of the incumbent; and

Extend the period a person may qualify for a nonpartisan general election.

Any request to withdraw by such additional candidates shall be filed no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the fourth day after the new qualifying deadline.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (f)(1), (2), and (4), if an incumbent member of the general assembly who has filed a petition for reelection is disqualified by the political party executive committee under § 2-5-204, then the incumbent member of the general assembly may file a new petition for the same office as a candidate for another political party or as an independent candidate. Notwithstanding the filing deadlines in this section, an incumbent member of the general assembly filing a petition under this subsection (i) shall file the petition no later than ninety (90) days before:

The primary election, if the incumbent is filing a petition as a candidate for another political party; or

The general election, if the incumbent is filing a petition as an independent candidate.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 160, § 1; 1974, ch. 660, § 1; 1974, ch. 731, § 1; 1975, ch. 26, § 1; 1975, ch. 83, § 1; 1977, ch. 47, § 1; 1978, ch. 940, § 1; 1979, ch. 115, § 1; 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 2-505, 2-511(c); Acts 1981, ch. 382, § 1; 1981, ch. 385, § 3; 1981, ch. 478, §§ 12, 13; 1982, ch. 871, §§ 4, 5; 1982, ch. 894, § 1; 1983, ch. 266, § 1; 1985, ch. 81, § 1; 1986, ch. 562, § 20; 1988, ch. 516, § 1; 1988, ch. 933, §§ 5, 6, 13; 1989, ch. 128, §§ 1, 3; 1989, ch. 247, § 1; 1989, ch. 590, §§ 7-9; 1990, ch. 628, § 3; 1991, ch. 153, §§ 1-6; 1991, ch. 373, § 3; 1991, ch. 414, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 771, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 87, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 756, § 8; 2001, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 374, § 13; 2004, ch. 480, § 4; 2008, ch. 618, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 955, § 9; 2015, ch. 508, § 2; 2016, ch. 604, § 2; 2020, ch. 713, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (h), concerning applicability of amendments by Acts 1991, ch. 153 to elections in counties in 1991, was deleted as obsolete in 2014 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 247, § 2 also provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to nominating petitions filed after May 9, 1989.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2020, ch. 713, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to the 2020 election and all subsequent elections.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (g)(1)(F).

The 2016 amendment added (g)(1)(G).

The 2020 amendment added (i).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 508, § 3. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 604, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2020, ch. 713, § 2. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Failure to use standard time, §4-1-401.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 2, 12.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Qualifying deadlines, constitutionality, OAG 88-42 (2/29/88).

Application of “sore loser” provisions to counties where candidates are nominated by party caucus, OAG 95-062 (5/26/95).

Simultaneously holding offices of constitutional convention delegate and general assembly member, OAG 98-054 (3/3/98).

County-wide offices include general sessions and juvenile court judgeships, OAG 98-097 (5/21/98).

Deadlines for filing nominating petitions for interim city council election, OAG 98-0172 (8/27/98).

Constitutionality of requirements for ballot access by new political parties, OAG 99-121 (5/19/99).

The same individual may not run for the office of sheriff and constable in the same election, OAG 02-012 (1/18/02).

Under T.C.A. §2-5-101(f)(5), the same individual may not run for the offices of county commissioner and constable in the same election. But neither this statute nor T.C.A. §5-5-102(c)(2) prohibits a constable from being nominated for or elected to membership in the county legislative body at some other time, OAG 08-177 (11/20/08).

Procedures for filling a vacancy in the state senate. OAG 14-78, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (8/27/14).

2-5-102. Nominating petitions — Form — Requirements.

Nominating petitions shall be in substantially the following form:

We the undersigned registered voters of the city of ,

(for municipal elections)

in the county of , State of Tennessee, (and members of the (for primaries) ________ Party), hereby nominate.

(for municipal elections)

__ ,

County as a candidate (for nomination) for the office of

(for primaries)

to be voted in the election to be held on the day of , . We request that such candidate's name be printed on the official ballot.

This petition was issued by

(signature of administrator of elections, deputy or election commissioner)

TO BE COMPLETED BY CANDIDATE

I hereby direct that my name appear on the official ballot as follows:

PRINT NAME

(residential address of candidate) (zip) (telephone)

(business address of candidate) (zip) (telephone)

FOR CANDIDATES REQUIRED TO BE AN ATTORNEY:

By my signature, I hereby certify that I

am licensed to practice law in this state.

(signature of candidate)

SUPREME COURT REGISTRATION No.

NOMINATING SIGNATURES

(Must be registered voters who are eligible to vote to fill this office)

Signature of Voter Address of Residence as Shown on

Voter Registration

All nominating petitions required for nomination and election to all congressional, state, county, municipal and political party executive committee offices shall be furnished only by the county election commission office. At the time of issuance of the nominating petitions, the administrator of elections, deputy or a county election commissioner shall type or handwrite in ink at the top of the cover page and each succeeding page of the form the name of the candidate, the office sought by the candidate, including any division, part, district or other identifying number for the office sought, and shall sign and date the form. Additional pages to be attached to a nominating petition may be obtained at a later date; provided, that each additional page must also have the name of the candidate, the office being sought and any identifying number for the office typed or handwritten at the top by the administrator, deputy or election commissioner along with the candidate's signature and the date.

Nominating petitions for offices listed in § 2-13-202 may also be obtained from the office of the coordinator of elections. An employee of the coordinator's office has the same responsibilities as the administrator, deputy and election commissioners in subdivision (b)(1).

The items to be completed under subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) may not be altered, and a petition on which any of these items has been altered may not be accepted in the office in which it is required to be filed in this state. Neither shall any original nominating petition be accepted on which any of the items required to be completed under subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) have been photocopied.

If a county election commission finds it necessary to photocopy the nominating petition, the county election commission shall indicate in the upper right hand corner of each page that the document was photocopied by the county election commission prior to distributing the form to a candidate. Such information shall be typed, stamped or otherwise permanently affixed to the form.

Nominating petitions must not be issued by any administrator, deputy, county election commissioner, or employee of the coordinator's office more than sixty (60) days before the qualifying deadline for the office for which the petition is issued; provided, that nominating petitions for the offices of President of the United States and delegates to the national conventions of all statewide political parties may be issued only by an employee of the coordinator's office and must not be issued more than ninety (90) days before the applicable qualifying deadline for the respective office. During any year in which reapportionment must occur, the coordinator of elections shall determine the earliest date on which petitions may be issued.

(address)

(division, part or district number)

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-506; Acts 1991, ch. 198, § 1; 1992, ch. 757, § 1; 1997, ch. 558, § 4; 2001, ch. 413, § 14; 2014, ch. 724, § 4; 2018, ch. 637, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “FOR CANDIDATES REQUIRED TO BE AN ATTORNEY” for “FOR JUDICIAL CANDIDATES ONLY” in the nominating petition form.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (b)(5), rewrote the first sentence which read: “Nominating petitions shall not be issued by any administrator, deputy, county election commissioner or employee of the coordinator's office more than ninety (90) days before the qualifying deadline for the office for which the petition is issued.”, and substituted “During any year in which” for “In any year where” at the beginning of the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Acts 2018, ch. 637, § 2. January 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Signer of nominating petition must include address, §2-1-107.

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. §2-5-101(f)(5), the same individual may not run for the offices of county commissioner and constable in the same election. But neither that statute nor T.C.A. §5-5-102(c)(2) prohibits a constable from being nominated for or elected to membership in the county legislative body at some other time, OAG 08-177 (11/20/08).

2-5-103. Candidates for statewide elections.

Each independent or primary candidate for an office elected by the voters of the entire state shall file the candidate's original nominating petition in the office of the state election commission and a certified duplicate with the coordinator of elections and with the chair of the party's state executive committee in the case of primary candidates.

The chair of the state election commission shall, no later than twelve (12:00) noon prevailing time on the first Thursday after the deadlines set in § 2-5-101, certify to the chairs of the county election commissions the names of all candidates who have qualified under this section to have their names on the ballots for general or primary elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-507.

2-5-104. Candidates for other than statewide elections.

Each independent or primary candidate, other than those filing under § 2-5-103, and those filing under subsection (b) or subsection (c), shall file the candidate's original nominating petition with the chair or the administrator of elections of the county election commission in the county in which the candidate is a resident and shall file certified duplicates of the nominating petition with the chairs or administrators of the county election commissions in all counties wholly or partially within the area served by the office which the candidate seeks.

Each independent or primary candidate for the office of representative to the United States congress shall file the candidate's nominating petitions as a candidate for an office elected by the voters of the entire state would file the candidate's nominating petitions under the provisions of § 2-5-103.

However, any independent and primary candidate for the office of representative to the United States congress from a district located entirely in one (1) county shall file the candidate's nominating petitions under the provisions of this section.

Each candidate for municipal office shall file the candidate's original nominating petition with the county election commission where the municipality is located. If the municipality is located in more than one (1) county, the candidate shall file the nominating petition with the county election commission of the county responsible for holding the election pursuant to § 6-53-101.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 31, § 1; 1977, ch. 480, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 2; 1979, ch. 115, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-508; Acts 1982, ch. 746, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 720, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to municipal elections for cities located in more than one county, OAG 96-129 (11/12/96).

2-5-105. Certification of political party nominees.

Political party nominees are qualified by certification of their names as nominees under chapter 8 of this title or §§2-13-101 —2-13-205.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-503.

2-5-106. Certification of attorney on nominating petition.

Any person seeking election to any office that is required by law to be held by an attorney shall certify on the person's nominating petition for such office that such person is licensed to practice law in this state, and shall place on such petition the person's supreme court registration number.

Any person failing to comply with this section shall be disqualified from having the person's name placed on the election ballot for such office.

Acts 1989, ch. 590, § 10; 2014, ch. 724, § 3.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “any office” for “a judicial office” near the beginning of (a); and substituted “such office” for “such judicial office” at the end of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

2-5-107. Inapplicability of part to certain retention elections.

This part shall not apply to a retention election in which a judge of the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals seeks election to fill the office to which the incumbent judge was appointed and confirmed. Title 17, chapter 4, part 1 shall govern such elections.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

2-5-108 — 2-5-150. [Reserved.]

Any governmental entity having a charter provision for a petition for recall, referendum or initiative or any person acting pursuant to such charter provision shall meet the requirements of this section.

Before a petition may be circulated, at least one (1) registered voter of the city or county shall file with the county election commission:

The proper form of the petition; and

The text of the question posed in the petition.

The county election commission shall certify whether the petition is in proper form within thirty (30) days after the filing of the documentation required by subsection (b). The individual or individuals filing the petition shall have fifteen (15) days to cure any defects in the documentation required by subsection (b) by filing revised documentation in proper form with the county election commission. The county election commission shall determine within fifteen (15) days whether or not the revised documentation shall be certified for final approval.

Petitions shall be signed by at least fifteen percent (15%) of those registered to vote in the municipality or county. The disqualification of one (1) or more signatures shall not render a petition invalid, but shall disqualify such signatures from being counted towards the statutory minimum number of signatures required in this section.

Upon filing, each completed petition shall contain the following:

The full text of the question attached to each petition;

The genuine signature and address of registered voters only, pursuant to the requirements of § 2-1-107;

The printed name of each signatory; and

The date of signature.

Completed petitions shall be filed with the county election commission within seventy-five (75) days after final certification by the county election commission as required by subsection (c).

In addition, a petition for recall, referendum or initiative shall be filed at least ninety (90) days before a general municipal or county election may be held on the question contained in such petition. The question contained in a petition filed less than ninety (90) days before an upcoming general municipal or county election will be placed on the ballot of the following general municipal or county election.

Any person may request either in person or in writing that the county election commission remove such person's name from a petition. Such request must be made within eight (8) days of filing of the completed petition and before final certification by the county election commission of the petition.

The county election commission shall certify whether or not the completed petition meets all applicable requirements within thirty (30) days of filing of the completed petition.

Upon certification by the county election commission pursuant to subsection (h), the election commission shall publish the question contained in the petition pursuant to § 2-12-111.

This section shall control notwithstanding any statutory provision or charter provision of a municipality or county to the contrary; provided, that any contrary charter provision of a municipality or county which is enacted after July 1, 1997, shall control with respect only to the requirements set forth in subsection (d) relating to the statutory minimum number of signatures required in a petition, and to the provisions of subdivision (f)(1) relating to the seventy-five-day deadline for filing of a petition after final certification by the county election commission.

This section shall control any petition with signatures filed with the county election commission on or after June 25, 1997.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this section shall not apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1997, ch. 558, § 33; 2005, ch. 428, § 1; 2012, ch. 1101, § 4; 2013, ch. 231, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Application to recall petition for city council member, OAG 97-149 (10/23/97).

Scheduling recall election, OAG 00-052 (3/22/00).

To the extent that a city charter authorized a county election commission to set a special election on a date other than the next available general municipal or county election more than 60 days from certification of the recall petition, the charter conflicted with and was superseded by T.C.A. §2-5-151(f)(2), OAG 01-100 (6/18/01).

A recall election under a city charter is a “special election,” but must be held at the same time as the next “general municipal or county election” more than 60 days from certification of the recall petition, OAG 01-100 (6/18/01).

The redistricting by a city of its council districts during the 75 day signature gathering period in T.C.A. §2-5-151(f)(2) has no effect on the requirements of T.C.A. §§2-5-151(e)(2) and2-1-107, OAG 01-100 (6/18/01).

If a timely filed petition satisfies all the requirements of this section and the applicable requirements of the city charter, then the county election commission may conduct the referendum with a general city-wide judicial election, OAG 03-109 (9/8/03).

Whether subsection (j) of this section or T.C.A. §6-53-108 supersedes a municipal charter provision on recall depends on whether the charter conflicts with either of the statutes, OAG 04-135 (8/23/04).

Recall petitions in multi-district cities or counties. OAG 12-56, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (5/21/12).

Removal of county property assessor for misconduct. OAG 13-30, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (4/5/13).

Referendum on deannexation. OAG 13-45, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (6/11/13).